Arkansas, session 2025, SB575.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-65-119(a)(2), as amended by Acts 2025,
No. 419, § 50, concerning the distribution of the driver's license
reinstatement fee collected by the Office of Driver Services after a
suspension for driving or boating while intoxicated or refusal to submit to a
chemical test, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The fee under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be
distributed as follows:
(A) Seven percent (7%) of the revenues derived from this
fee shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues and
credited to the Public Health Fund to be used exclusively for the Office of
Alcohol Testing of the Department of Health;
(B) Thirty-three percent (33%) of the revenues derived
*CEB259*
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
from this fee shall be deposited as special revenues into the State Treasury
into the Constitutional Officers Fund and the State Central Services Fund as
a direct revenue to be used by the Office of Driver Services for use in
supporting the administrative driver's licensing revocation and sanctions
programs provided for in this subchapter;
(C) Ten percent (10%) of the revenues derived from this
fee shall be deposited into the State Treasury, and the Treasurer of State
shall credit them as general revenues to the various funds in the respective
amounts to each and to be used for the purposes as provided in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.; and
(D) Fifty percent (50%) of the revenues derived from this
fee shall be deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to the
credit of the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund deposited into the State
Treasury and the Treasurer of State shall credit the amount as general
revenue to the various funds in the respective amounts to each to be used for
the purposes provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 5-65-304(d)(3), concerning the driver
privilege reinstatement fee collected by the Office of Driver Services after
a suspension for underage driving or boating under the influence, is amended
to read as follows:
(3) Forty percent (40%) of the revenues derived from the fee
under this subsection shall be deposited into the State Treasury, as special
revenues and credited to the Public Health Fund to be used exclusively for
the Blood Alcohol Program of the Department of Health and the Treasurer of
State shall credit the amount as general revenue to the various funds in the
respective amounts to each to be used for the purposes provided in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 5-65-310(f)(3), concerning the driving
privilege reinstatement fee collected by the Office of Driver Services after
a suspension for an underaged person for refusal to submit to a chemical
test, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Forty percent (40%) of the revenues derived from the fee
under this subsection shall be deposited into the State Treasury, as special
revenues and credited to the Public Health Fund to be used exclusively for
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
the Blood Alcohol Program of the Department of Health and the Treasurer of
State shall credit the amount as general revenue to the various funds in the
respective amounts to each to be used for the purposes provided in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 16-13-704(b)(2)(A)(i), as amended by Acts
2025, No. 371, concerning the installment fee collected in circuit court, is
amended to read as follows:
(2)(A)(i) One-half (½) of the installment fee collected in
circuit court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the
Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative
Services of the Department of Finance and Administration, on a form provided
by the Office of Administrative Services, for deposit into the Judicial Fine
Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712 into the State
Treasury, and the Treasurer of State shall credit that portion of the
installment fee as general revenue to the various funds in the respective
amounts to each to be used for the purposes provided in the Revenue
Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 16-13-704(b)(3)(A), as amended by Acts
2025, No. 371, concerning the installment fee collected in district court, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) One-half (½) of the installment fee collected in district
court shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration
of Justice Funds Section, on a form provided by that section, for deposit
into the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712
into the State Treasury as general revenue and the Treasurer of State shall
credit that portion of the installment fee to the various funds in the
respective amounts to each to be used for the purposes provided in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 16-13-704(b)(3)(E)(ii), as amended by Acts
2025, No. 371, concerning the additional installment fee collected in
district court, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) In district court only, an installment fee of
an additional five dollars ($5.00) per month shall also be assessed on the
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
first day of each month on each person who is ordered to pay a fine on an
installment basis with the additional five dollars ($5.00) to be remitted by
the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section on
a form provided by that section for deposit into the State Administration of
Justice Fund into the State Treasury, and the Treasurer of State shall credit
the additional installment fee as general revenue to the various funds in the
respective amounts to each to be used for the purposes provided in the
Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(120), concerning the
classification of revenue from certain driver's license reinstatement fees as
special revenue, is repealed.
(120) That portion of driver's license reinstatement fees for
the Office of Driver Services, § 5-65-119(a)(2)(B);

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(155), concerning the
classification of revenue from certain driver's license reinstatement fees as
special revenue, is repealed.
(155) That portion of driver's license reinstatement fees for
the Office of Alcohol Testing, § 5-65-119(a)(2)(A), § 5-65-304(d), and § 5-
65-310(f);

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(218), concerning the
classification of revenue from certain driver's license reinstatement fees as
special revenue, is repealed.
(218) That portion of an operator's driver's license
reinstatement fees, § 5-65-119(a)(2)(D);

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 19-6-301(219), concerning the
classification of revenue from certain driver's license reinstatement fees as
special revenue, is repealed.
(219) That portion of suspended, revoked, or cancelled driver's
license reinstatement fees, § 27-16-508(c) and § 27-16-808(b)(2);

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 21-6-416(b) and (c), concerning the court
technology fee, as amended by Acts 2025, No. 371, § 13, are amended to read
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
as follows:
(b) The court technology fee is as follows:
(1) For all civil actions and misdemeanors filed in either the
Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals............. $15.00
(2) For initiating a cause of action in the civil, domestic
relations, or probate division of circuit court, including
appeals............. 15.00
(3) For initiating a cause of action in the civil or small
claims division of district court............. 15.00
(4) For all criminal and traffic cases, from each defendant upon
24 each conviction, each plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or each bond
25 forfeiture............. 15.00.
(c)(1) The fee provided under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
collected in the Supreme Court or the Court of Appeals shall be remitted by
the Clerk of the Supreme Court on or before the fifteenth day of each month
to the Administration of Justice Funds Section on a form provided by the
Office of Administrative Services for deposit into the Judicial Fine
Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.
(2) The fee provided under subdivisions (b)(2)—(4) (b)(2) and
(3) of this section collected in circuit court or district court shall be
remitted by the county or city official, agency, or department designated
under § 16-13-709 as primarily responsible for the collection of fines
assessed in circuit court or district court on or before the fifteenth day of
each month to the section, on a form provided by the office, for deposit into
the Judicial Fine Collection Enhancement Fund established by § 16-13-712.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 27-16-508(b), concerning the driver's
license reinstatement fee collected by the Office of Driver Services, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) The revenues derived from this fee shall be deposited into the
State Treasury, as special revenues to the credit of the Division of Arkansas
State Police Fund and the Treasurer of State shall credit these revenues as
general revenue to the various funds in the respective amounts to each to be
used for the purposes provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
et seq.

04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 27-16-808(b), concerning the driver's
license reinstatement fee collected by the Office of Driver Services, is
amended to read as follows:
(b) All proceeds remitted to the Office of Driver Services under this
section shall be deposited as follows:
(1) Twenty-five percent (25%) to the State Police Retirement
Fund; and
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) to the State Treasury as special
revenues to the credit of the Division of Arkansas State Police Fund into the
State Treasury, and the Treasurer of State shall credit these proceeds as
general revenue to the various funds in the respective amounts to each to be
used for the purposes provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
et seq.

SECTION 14. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Justice System Fee
Task Force — Findings — Intent — Creation — Membership — Duties.
(a)(1) The General Assembly finds that:
(A) The justice system in Arkansas imposes an excessive
number of fees on individuals charged with or convicted of crimes or
otherwise involved in the justice system;
(B) The collective impact of these fees on the individuals
they are imposed upon substantially inhibits their ability to move forward
with their lives in a constructive manner;
(C) Many of the fees in the justice system no longer serve
a productive purpose; and
(D) Altering the structure of or eliminating many of the
fees in the justice system would serve the people of Arkansas by reducing
recidivism and therefore improving public safety.
(2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(A) Implement safe policy changes that will improve the
effectiveness of the fees in the justice system in a manner that will:
(i) Reduce recidivism;
(ii) Lower crime across the state; and
(iii) Enhance the ability of individuals charged
with or convicted of crimes to turn their lives around; and
(B) Establish the Justice System Fee Task Force as a
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
mechanism to study the fees in the justice system and make recommendations to
the General Assembly regarding the possible alteration or elimination of
those fees.
(b)(1) There is created the Justice System Fee Task Force.
(2) The task force shall consist of the following thirteen (13)
members:
(A) Two (2) members appointed by the Governor as follows:
(i) One (1) member who is a representative of the
Arkansas Public Defender Commission; and
(ii) One (1) member who is a prosecuting attorney;
(B) Two (2) members of the Senate appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(C) Two (2) members of the House of Representatives
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(D) Two (2) members who are staff members of the
Administrative Office of the Courts appointed by the Director of the
Administrative Office of the Courts;
(E) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections or his
or her designee;
(F) One (1) circuit court judge appointed by the President
of the Judicial Council;
(G) One (1) district court judge appointed by the
President of the Arkansas District Judges Council, Inc.;
(H) One (1) member designated by the Association of
Arkansas Counties; and
(I) One (1) member designated by the Arkansas Municipal
League.
(3) If a vacancy occurs on the task force, the vacancy shall be
filled by the same process as the original appointment.
(4)(A) The Senate members appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section shall call the
first meeting of the task force no later than August 31, 2025.
(B) At the first meeting of the task force, the members of
the task force shall elect from their membership a chair and other officers
as needed for the transaction of the business of the task force.
(C) The task force shall meet at least quarterly and shall
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
meet:
(i) At the call of the chair; or
(ii) Upon the calling of a meeting by a majority of
the members of the task force.
(5) The task force shall meet at the State Capitol Building or
in the legislative committee rooms in the Multi-Agency Complex on the State
Capitol grounds.
(6) The task force shall adopt rules and procedures for
conducting its business.
(7) Six (6) members of the task force shall constitute a quorum
for transacting business of the task force.
(c) The task force shall study and recommend improvements to the
justice system fees in the State of Arkansas.
(d) As part of its study under subsection (c) of this section, the
task force shall:
(1) Conduct a comprehensive analysis of each fee in the Arkansas
justice system, including without limitation:
(A) The amount of each fee;
(B) The purpose of each fee;
(C) The amount of revenue generated by each fee;
(D) The programs funded by the revenue generated by each
fee; and
(E) The efficacy of each fee;
(2) Examine the effectiveness of current practices of imposing
justice system fees on individuals in Arkansas; and
(3) Develop recommendations for the General Assembly for
improving the system of imposing justice system fees on individuals.
(e)(1) On or before December 1, 2026, the task force shall submit its
final report to the:
(A) Legislative Council;
(B) Governor; and
(C) Supreme Court.
(2) The final report shall include the task force's activities,
findings, and recommendations, including without limitation:
(A) Recommendations for improving the system of imposing
fees on individuals in the justice system; and
04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 H4/9/25 SB575
(B) The funding necessary to accommodate each
recommendation made under subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this section.
(f) The task force expires on December 31, 2026.

SECTION 15. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 through 13 of this act are
effective on July 1, 2026.

/s/C. Tucker




























04-09-2025 11:36:18 CEB259